Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 2 Powers and Duties of Commission as to Railroad
Companies Generally

46-8-20.
Exclusive power of commission to determine just and reasonable rates and charges; establishing rates and tariffs generally; locating of depots and construction of freight and passenger buildings.

The power to determine what are just and reasonable rates and charges is vested exclusively in the commission.

The commission:

Shall make reasonable and just rates of freight and passenger tariffs, such rates to be observed by all railroad companies doing business in this state;

Shall make reasonable and just rules and regulations as to charges at any and all points for the necessary handling and delivering of freights, such rules and regulations to be observed by all railroad companies doing business in this state;

Shall make such just and reasonable rules and regulations as may be necessary for preventing unjust discrimination in the transportation of freight and passengers on the railroads in this state;

Shall have the power to make, for all connecting railroads doing business in this state, just and reasonable joint rates as to all traffic or business passing from one of those railroads to another, provided that before applying joint rates to railroads that are not under the management and control of a single company, the commission shall give 30 days’ notice to the railroads of the joint rate contemplated and of the manner in which it proposes to divide the rate between the railroads, and shall accord a hearing to any company desiring to object to the rates or the manner of their division;

Shall make reasonable and just rates for the use of railroad cars, no matter by whom owned or carried, carrying any kind of freight and passengers on the railroads; and

Shall make just and reasonable rules and regulations to prevent the giving or paying of any rebate or bonus, directly or indirectly, and to prevent the misleading or deceiving of the public in any manner as to the real rates charged for freight and passengers.

The commission shall have full power, by rule and regulation, to designate and fix the difference in rates of freight and passenger transportation to be allowed for long and short distances on the same or different railroads and to ascertain what shall be the limits of long and short distances.

The commission shall have the power to require the location of such depots and the construction of such freight and passenger buildings as the condition of the railroad, the safety of freight, and the public comfort and convenience may require, upon the giving to such railroad company to be affected thereby the same notice as is provided in paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 5; Code 1882, § 719e; Ga. L. 1889, p. 131, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2189; Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 5; Civil Code 1910, § 2630; Code 1933, § 93-309.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Further provisions regarding establishment, revision, etc., of rates and charges for railroad transportation, §

46-9-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment on Georgia Power Co. v. Allied Chem. Corp.,

233 Ga. 558

,

212 S.E.2d 628

(1975), see 27 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (1975).

46-8-21.
Powers of commission regarding railroads generally.

The commission shall have power and authority:

To ascertain the cost of construction and the present value of properties in Georgia owned by railroad companies; and to that end, the commission may employ necessary experts;

To prescribe rules with reference to the use, construction, removal, or change of spurtracks and sidetracks, with full power to compel service to be furnished to manufacturing plants, warehouses, and similar places of business along the line of railroads where practicable and where in the judgment of the commission the business is sufficient to justify the same and on such terms and conditions as the commission may prescribe;

To order and compel the operation of sufficient and proper passenger service when in its judgment inefficient or insufficient service is being rendered to the public or any community;

To order and compel the making and operating of physical connections between lines of railroads crossing or intersecting each other or entering the same incorporated city, when in its judgment such connections are practicable and in the public interest;

To fix penalties for neglect on the part of railroad companies to adjust overcharges and losses, or failure to decline to do so, if deemed unjust, in a reasonable time;

To prescribe rules requiring the prompt receipt, carriage, and delivery of freight and the prompt furnishing of cars to shippers desiring to ship freight, and to prescribe penalties for failure to observe such rules, and to prescribe rules and penalties regarding the transfer of cars through yards of connecting roads;

To order the erection of depots and stations where it deems the same necessary and to order the appointment and service of depot or station agents; and

To regulate schedules and compel connections at junction points of competing lines.

History.

Ga. L. 1907, p. 72, § 7; Civil Code 1910, § 2664; Code 1933, § 93-308.

46-8-22.
Investigation by commission of books and papers of railroad companies; inspection of railroad offices and stations; examination of railroad’s agents and employees; rules and regulations concerning investigations and inspections.

It shall be the duty of the commission to investigate the books and papers of all railroad companies doing business in this state in order to ascertain if the rules and regulations of the commission have been complied with, to make personal visitation to railroad offices, stations, and other places of business for the purpose of examinations, and to make rules and regulations concerning such examinations, which rules and regulations shall be observed and obeyed as the other rules and regulations of the commission.

The commission shall have full power and authority to examine any person, including agents and employees of railroad companies, under oath or otherwise, in order to procure the information necessary to make just and reasonable freight and passenger rates and to ascertain whether rules and regulations of the commission are observed or violated. The commission shall have the power to make necessary and proper rules and regulations concerning such examinations, which rules and regulations shall be obeyed and enforced as all other rules and regulations of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 7; Code 1882, § 719; Civil Code 1895, § 2192; Civil Code 1910, § 2633; Code 1933, § 93-301.

46-8-23.
Prescription and enforcement by commission of rules, regulations, and orders as to receipt, transportation, and delivery of freight by railroads.

The commission is vested with full power and authority to make, prescribe, and enforce all such reasonable rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary to compel and require the several railroad companies in this state to receive, receipt for, forward, and deliver promptly to destination all freight of every character which may be tendered or received by them for transportation. In addition, the commission shall have full power and authority to make, prescribe, and enforce such reasonable rules, regulations, and orders as may be necessary to compel and require prompt delivery to the consignee of all freights on arrival at destination.

History.

Ga. L. 1905, p. 120, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2634; Code 1933, § 93-302.

46-8-24.
Inspection by commission of contracts and agreements between railroad companies; disapproval of agreements; inclusion in agreements of rates exceeding rates fixed by commission.

All contracts and agreements as to freight and passenger rates between railroad companies doing business in this state shall be submitted to the commission for inspection and correction so that it may be ascertained whether or not such contracts and agreements are in violation of the laws of this state, of the Constitution of Georgia, or of the rules and regulations of the commission. All arrangements and agreements whatever as to the division of earnings of any kind by competing railroad companies doing business in this state shall be submitted to the commission for inspection and approval, insofar as such arrangements and agreements affect rules and regulations made by the commission to secure to all persons doing business with such companies just and reasonable freight and passenger rates. The commission may make such rules and regulations as to such contracts and agreements as may be then deemed necessary and proper. Any such agreements not approved by the commission, or by virtue of which rates are charged exceeding the rates fixed by the commission for freight and passengers, shall be deemed to be violations of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph V(c) of the Constitution of Georgia and shall be illegal and void.

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 125, § 8; Code 1882, § 719h; Civil Code 1895, § 2193; Civil Code 1910, § 2638; Code 1933, § 93-303; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 62.

46-8-25.
Inspection of railroads by commission; requiring repair of railroads; allotment of reasonable time for repairs; effect of Code section on liability of railroads.

The commission, upon complaint, shall inspect any railroad or any part of any railroad in this state. If the railroad is found to be in an unsafe or dangerous condition, the commission shall require the same to be put and kept in such condition as will render travel over the same safe and expeditious. Reasonable time shall be given the railroad authorities in which to accomplish the work or repairs required under this Code section. This Code section shall not limit or affect the liability of railroads in cases of injury or damage to persons or property.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 150, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2194; Civil Code 1910, § 2639; Code 1933, § 93-316.